Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-737
Arresting officer; authority.

Every such peace officer or other person empowered to make the arrest shall have the same authority, in arresting the accused, to command assistance therein, as peace officers have by law in the execution of any criminal process directed to them, with like penalties against those who refuse their assistance.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 9, p. 561.